California, session 20252026, SB908.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4754 is added to the Civil Code, to read:4754. (a) No governing documents shall limit or prohibit the owner of a separate interest within a common interest development from completing a residential window replacement project or impose any requirements on California Energy Code-compliant windows in a housing development project.(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “California Energy Code-compliant windows” means windows that meet or exceed the mandatory requirements for fenestration products and exterior doors, as described in Section 110.6 of the California Energy Code (Part 6 of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations) or a subsequent code section adopted by the California Building Standards Commission in the most recent triennial building code cycle.(2) “Housing development project” means a housing development project as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code.(3) “Residential window replacement project” has the same meaning as defined in Section 65850.73 of the Government Code.SEC. 2. Section 65850.73 is added to the Government Code, to read:65850.73. (a)  The Legislature finds and declares that retrofitting windows in existing residential buildings with windows that meet current California Energy Code standards is critical to reducing energy consumption and achieving the state’s climate goals, which is a matter of statewide concern and is not a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this section applies to all cities, including charter cities.(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “Housing development project” means a housing development project as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5.(2) “Residential window replacement project” means a project that meets all of the following requirements:(A) The project proposes only to replace existing windows in a single-family or multifamily residential structure with windows of the same size and in the same location.(B) The project does not involve any physical alterations to the existing structure beyond those necessary to install those windows.(C) The proposed window installation complies with all applicable provisions of the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), including, but not limited to the California Residential Code, California Building Code, California Fire Code, California Wildland-Urban Interface Code, and the California Energy Code.(3) “State Historic Resources Inventory” has the same meaning as defined in Section 5020.1 of the Public Resources Code.(4) “Local register of historical resources” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 5020.1 of the Public Resources Code.(c) A city, county, or city and county shall administratively approve an application for a residential window replacement project.(d) A city, county, or city and county shall not require discretionary review or a hearing for a residential window replacement project.(e) A city, county, or city and county shall not deny an application for a residential window replacement project unless it makes written findings, based upon substantial evidence in the record, that the residential window replacement project would have a specific, adverse impact upon public health or safety and there is no feasible method to satisfactorily mitigate or avoid the specific, adverse impact.(f) Any conditions imposed on a residential window replacement project shall be limited to objective conditions that are necessary to mitigate a specific, adverse impact upon public health or safety identified pursuant to subdivision (e).(g) A local government that is both a city and county shall not impose any conditions on a window proposed in a housing development project other than objective conditions that are necessary to mitigate a specific adverse impact upon public health or safety, provided that the window complies with all applicable provisions of the California Building Standards Code (Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), including, but not limited to, the California Residential Code, California Building Code, California Fire Code, California Wildland-Urban Interface Code, and the California Energy Code. A local government that is both a city and county shall make written findings, based upon substantial evidence in the record, that the proposed window would have a specific, adverse impact upon public health or safety.(h) This section shall not apply to either of the following:(1) A residential structure that is individually listed as a historical resource in the State Historic Resources Inventory, provided that the parcel or structure were was designated prior to the date an application to replace existing for a residential windows with California Energy Code-compliant windows window replacement project is submitted.(2)A residential structure individually designated or listed as a city or county landmark under a city or county ordinance or a residential structure on a site designated as a historical resource on a local register. A local ordinance that designates multiple properties as historical based solely on the age of the structure, or an ordinance that designates a district or neighborhood as historical, does not constitute an ordinance that individually identifies a structure as a city or county landmark.(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a residential structure that is individually listed on a local register of historical resources or as a contributor to a multicomponent resource, provided that the structure was designated prior to the date an application for a residential window replacement project is submitted.(B) This paragraph shall not apply to a structure designated as historical based primarily on its age.SEC. 3. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique development regulations within certain areas of the state that are both a city and county.SEC. 4.  No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.